Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 4 Boards of Election Commissioners and Other Election Officers
7-4-109. Qualifications of state and county commissioners, election officials, poll workers, and certified election monitors.

(a)(1)

A member of the State Board of Election Commissioners, a county election commissioner, and an election official shall be a qualified elector of this state, able to read and write the English language, and shall not have been found guilty or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to the violation of an election law of this state.

(2)

An election official, as defined in §7-1-101, shall not be a candidate for an office to be filled at an election while serving as an election official.

(3)

A member of the county board of election commissioners shall not be disqualified from serving as a member of the county board of election commissioners by the appearance on the ballot as a candidate for a position in his or her political party.

(b)(1)

A member of a county board of election commissioners shall be a resident of the county in which he or she serves at the time of his or her appointment or election.

(2)(A)

An election official shall be a resident of the precinct in which he or she serves at the time of his or her appointment.

(B)

However, if at the time of posting election officials the county board of election commissioners votes unanimously and certifies to the county clerk that it is impossible to obtain a qualified election official from any precinct in the county, another qualified citizen of the county may be designated to serve in the precinct.

(C)

An election coordinator, deputy clerk, or person assigned by a county clerk to conduct early voting does not have to be a resident of the precinct or county in which he or she serves.

(c)(1)

A person who is a paid employee of a political party or of a candidate for office on that county's ballot shall not be a member of a county board of election commissioners or an election official.

(2)(A)

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this section, a person serving on the county board of election commissioners shall not participate in the campaign of any candidate listed on a ballot or of a write-in candidate seeking election in that county that falls under the county board of election commissioners’ jurisdiction or authority.

(B)(i)

A member of the county board of election commissioners shall not:

(a)

Manage a campaign;

(b)

Perform labor for a campaign;

(c)

Solicit on behalf of a candidate or campaign;

(d)

Pass out or place handbills, signs, or other literature concerning a candidate's campaign;

(e)

Assist a candidate's campaign at a rally or parade; or

(f)

Display candidate placards or signs on an automobile.

(ii)

A member of the county board of election commissioners may:

(a)

Make a financial contribution to a candidate;

(b)

Attend a political party's state, district, or county meeting where a candidate or issue advocate speaks as a member of the audience; or

(c)

Participate in a political party convention.

(3)

A person employed with a company that has a business dealing, contract, or pending contract with a county board of election commissioners to which he or she seeks appointment shall not be a candidate for the county board of election commissioners.

(d)

A person shall not serve as an election official if:

(1)

The person is married to or related within the second degree of consanguinity to a candidate running for office in the election; and

(2)

Another person makes an objection to his or her service to the county board of election commissioners within ten (10) calendar days after posting the list of officials.

(e)(1)

Prior to the regularly scheduled preferential primary election, each of the following shall attend election training coordinated by the State Board of Election Commissioners:

(A)

A member of the county board of election commissioners;

(B)

A county clerk or his or her designee;

(C)

A poll worker; and

(D)

A certified election monitor.

(2)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall determine the method and amount of compensation for attending the training.

(3)

A deputy county clerk, employee of the county clerk, or other worker who will assist with early voting may be trained by the county clerk or his or her designee.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 5, § 4, and Art. 13, § 5; 1971, No. 451, § 2; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 41, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-504, 3-1305; Acts 1987, No. 248, § 5; 1993, No. 715, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 647, § 7; 2001, No. 796, § 1; 2001, No. 1822, § 1; 2005, No. 894, § 1; 2005, No. 1827, § 3; 2007, No. 489, § 2; 2013, No. 1457, § 2; 2015, No. 1042, § 4; 2015, No. 1253, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in the section heading, deleted “and other” following “commissioners” and added “poll workers, and certified election monitors”; substituted “he or she serves” for “they serve” in (b)(1) and (b)(2)(A); substituted “his or her” for “their” in (b)(2)(A); in (b)(2)(B), substituted “votes unanimously and certifies to the county clerk” for “by unanimous vote shall find”; “in the county, another” for “or precincts and the county board shall make certification of that finding to the county clerk, then other”; in (c)(1), substituted “a candidate” for “any person running” and “not” for “be eligible to”; rewrote (c)(2)(A), (c)(2)(B), (c)(3), and (d); and substituted “poll worker, and certified election monitor” for “for each county and at least two (2) election officials per polling site designated by the county board for each county” in (e)(1); and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment by No. 1042 added (b)(2)(C).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1253 rewrote (c)(2) and (e)(1); and added (e)(3).

Party Chairman.

Since county party chairman was ex officio member of the board of election commissioners, person ineligible to serve as county election commissioner was ineligible to serve as party chairman. Jones v. Duckett, 234 Ark. 990, 356 S.W.2d 5 (1962) (decision under prior law).

7-4-110. Oath of election officers.

(a)

The election officials, before entering on their duties, shall take, before some person authorized by law to administer oaths, the following oath:

“I,
, do swear that I will perform the duties of an election official of this election according to law and to the best of my abilities, and that I will studiously endeavor to prevent fraud, deceit, and abuse in conducting the same, and that I will not disclose how any voter shall have voted, unless required to do so as a witness in a judicial proceeding or a proceeding to contest an election.”

(b)

In case there shall be no person present at the opening of any election authorized to administer oaths, it shall be lawful for the election officials to administer the oath to each other, and the election officials shall have full power and authority to administer all oaths that may be necessary in conducting any election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-704; Acts 1997, No. 647, § 8.

7-4-111. Compensation of board members.

(a)

The State Board of Election Commissioners may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

(b)

Each member of the county board of election commissioners shall receive for services the sum of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per public meeting when official business is conducted.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 5, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-507; Acts 1987, No. 403, § 1; 1995, No. 709, § 13; 1997, No. 250, § 42; 1997, No. 647, § 9; 2005, No. 1677, § 2.

7-4-112. Compensation of election officials.

(a)

Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section, an election official shall receive a minimum of the prevailing federal minimum wage for holding an election, or such greater amount as may be appropriated.

(b)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section and in addition to compensation under subsection (a) of this section, each election official carrying election materials to and from the polling sites shall be allowed mileage at such rate as may be appropriated but not to exceed the rate prescribed for state employees in state travel rules.

(c)(1)

An election official may work as a volunteer without pay or reimbursement as specified by the election official under this section if the election official signs an affidavit prescribed by the State Board of Election Commissioners stating that he or she does not wish to receive:

(A)

Compensation for his or her work as an election official; or

(B)

Reimbursement for mileage accrued in the course of his or her work as an election official.

(2)

An election official may choose not to receive compensation or reimbursement, or both.

(3)(A)

An election official who signs the affidavit indicating that he or she does not wish to be compensated or reimbursed shall not be compensated with money or anything of value for his or her work as an election official.

(B)

Any paperwork or document required by a student election official's school to verify his or her assistance is not compensation or reimbursement under this section.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 20; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 11, § 1; 1983, No. 169, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-720; Acts 1997, No. 647, § 10; 2005, No. 67, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 416; 2019, No. 539, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 539 substituted “Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section, an election official shall receive” for “The election officials shall receive” in (a); substituted “Except as provided in subsection (c) and in addition to compensation under subsection (a) of this section” for “In addition” in (b); and added (c).

7-4-113. Record of funds and expenditures.

The county board of election commissioners of each county shall maintain a record of all funds the county board of election commissioners receives and all expenditures of the county board of election commissioners. These records shall be open to the public under the provisions of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 795, § 1.

7-4-114. Filling vacancy of an elected office — Effect.

Any member of a county board of election commissioners may be appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected office without vacating his or her seat on the county board of election commissioners. The member shall not be eligible for reelection to the office when the term expires.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 760, § 1.

7-4-115. Legislative intent.

Due to the United States Eighth Circuit Court of Appeals ruling in Jones v. Conway County, Arkansas, 143 F.3d 417 (8th Cir. 1998), the status of county election commissioners as either county officials or state officials has become unclear. Because of this lack of clarity, there has been much confusion as to whether or not county election commissioners should have been or currently are immune from suit under the state's policy of tort immunity. It is the intent of the General Assembly to clarify the official status of county election commissioners. Prior to July 30, 1999, county election commissioners were state officials and, as such, were immune from suit pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 20, and §19-10-305. Upon July 30, 1999, county election commissioners are hereby deemed to be county officials and are immune from suit pursuant to §21-9-301.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1422, § 1; 2019, No. 966, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “recent” preceding “United States” in the first sentence.

7-4-116. Election poll workers program for high school students.

(a)(1)

The county board of election commissioners may conduct a special election day program for high school students in one (1) or more polling places designated by the county board of election commissioners.

(2)

The high school students shall be selected by the county board of election commissioners in cooperation with the local high school principal, the local 4-H club, the local Boy Scouts of America club, the local Girl Scouts of the United States of America club, or any other local organization for youth designated by the county board of election commissioners.

(3)(A)

A high school student selected for this program who has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday by the election day in which he or she is participating shall be called an election page.

(B)

A high school student selected for this program who has reached his or her eighteenth birthday by the election day in which he or she is participating and meets the qualifications in §7-4-109 may be an election official.

(b)

The program shall:

(1)

Be designed to stimulate the students' interest in elections and registering to vote;

(2)

Provide assistance to the officers of election; and

(3)

Assist in the safe entry and exit of elderly voters and voters with disabilities from the polling place.

(c)(1)

In this volunteer position, each student selected as an election page shall:

(A)

Be granted an additional excused absence from school while working as an election page;

(B)

Serve under the direct supervision of the election officials at his or her assigned polling place; and

(C)

Observe strict impartiality at all times.

(2)

If an election page has attended training provided by the county board of election commissioners, the election page may assist election officials with checking in voters, assisting voters with instructions regarding the operation of voting machines, guarding the ballot box, and other related duties.

(3)

An election page shall be in a volunteer position and shall not receive any compensation for performing his or her duties.

(4)

Before beginning any duties, an election page shall take, before an election official, the following oath:

“I,
, do swear that I will perform the duties of an election page of this election according to law and to the best of my abilities, and that I will studiously endeavor to prevent fraud, deceit, and abuse, and that I will not disclose how any voter shall have voted, unless required to do so as a witness in a judicial proceeding or a proceeding to contest an election.”

(d)

Each student selected to be an election official shall:

(1)

Take the oath of the election officials in §7-4-110;

(2)

Serve under the supervision of the appropriate county board of election commissioners;

(3)

Observe strict impartiality at all times; and

(4)

Be granted an additional excused absence from school while working as an election official.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 242, § 1; 2005, No. 67, § 3; 2011, No. 1223, §§ 6, 7; 2013, No. 1322, §§ 5, 6; 2019, No. 328, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “granted an additional absence” for “excused” in (c)(1)(A) and (d)(1)(D).

The 2013 amendment inserted “excused” preceding “absence” in (c)(1)(A) and (d)(1)(D).

The 2019 amendment added “In this volunteer position” in the introductory language of (c)(1); rewrote (c)(2); redesignated (d)(1) as (d); and deleted (d)(2).

7-4-117. Election poll workers program for college students.

(a)(1)

The county board of election commissioners may conduct an election day program for college students in one (1) or more polling places designated by the county board of election commissioners.

(2)(A)

The college students shall be selected by the county board of election commissioners from any two-year or four-year college or university in the state.

(B)

The county board of election commissioners shall work in cooperation with the student government associations of the colleges and universities in selecting the students for the program and conducting seminars concerning election procedures for students interested in the program.

(3)(A)

A college student selected for this program who has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday by the election day in which he or she is participating shall be called an election page.

(B)

A college student selected for this program who has reached his or her eighteenth birthday by the election day in which he or she is participating and meets the qualifications in §7-4-109 shall be an election official.

(b)

The program shall:

(1)

Be designed to stimulate the students' interest in elections and in registering to vote;

(2)

Provide assistance to the officers of the election; and

(3)

Assist in the safe entry and exit of elderly voters and voters with disabilities from the polling place.

(c)(1)

Each student selected as an election page shall:

(A)

Serve under the direct supervision of the election officials at his or her assigned polling place; and

(B)

Observe strict impartiality at all times.

(2)

An election page may observe the electoral process and seek information from the election officers but shall not handle or touch ballots, voting machines, or any other official election materials or enter any voting booth.

(3)

An election page shall be in a volunteer position and shall not receive any compensation for performing his or her duties.

(4)

Before beginning any duties, an election page shall take, before an election official, the following oath:

“I,
, do swear that I will perform the duties of an election page of this election according to law and to the best of my abilities, and that I will studiously endeavor to prevent fraud, deceit, and abuse, and that I will not disclose how any voter shall have voted unless required to do so as a witness in a judicial proceeding or a proceeding to contest an election.”

(d)(1)

Each student selected to be an election official shall:

(A)

Take the oath of the election officials in §7-4-110;

(B)

Serve under the supervision of the appropriate county board of election commissioners; and

(C)

Observe strict impartiality at all times.

(2)

A college student selected to be an election official shall be compensated according to §7-4-112.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1153, § 1; 2005, No. 67, § 4.

7-4-118. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning complaints of election law violations, was repealed by Acts 2015, No. 1253, § 2.
The section was derived from Acts 2003, No. 1161, § 2; 2007, No. 559, § 4; 2013, No. 1126, § 3.

7-4-119. Disclosure required.

(a)

A member of a county board of election commissioners shall report to the Secretary of State by January 31 of each calendar year any goods or services sold during the previous calendar year by himself or herself, his or her spouse, or any business in which the member or his or her spouse is an officer, director, or stockholder owning more than ten percent (10%) of the stock having a total annual value in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) to an office, department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, legislative body, agency, or other establishment of:

(1)

The State of Arkansas;

(2)

A county;

(3)

A municipality; and

(4)

A school district.

(b)

The Secretary of State shall provide by rule for:

(1)

A form for the report; and

(2)

A procedure for the disclosure.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1216, § 1; 2013, No. 443, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2013, No. 443, § 2, provided: “Reports to be submitted to the Secretary of State under this act for the calendar year ending December 31, 2012, shall be due by September 1, 2013.”

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted “by January 31 of each calendar year” in the introductory language of (a); and added (b).

7-4-120. Complaints of election law violations — Definitions.

(a)(1)

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the State Board of Election Commissioners may investigate alleged violations, render findings, and impose sanctions according to this subchapter for violations of election and voter registration laws.

(2)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall not investigate alleged violations, render findings, or impose sanctions concerning violations of:

(A)

The provisions of §7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), and (7); or

(B)

Campaign finance and disclosure laws for which the Arkansas Ethics Commission has the duty and authority to investigate and sanction under §§7-6-217 and7-6-218.

(b)(1)

A complaint shall be filed with the State Board of Election Commissioners in writing within thirty (30) days of:

(A)

An alleged violation of the voter registration laws; or

(B)

The election associated with the complaint;

(2)

A complaint shall be signed by the complainant under penalty of perjury.

(3)(A)

A complaint shall clearly:

(i)

Describe the alleged violation, including without limitation the supporting facts for the violation;

(ii)

State when the alleged violation occurred; and

(iii)

State the location of the alleged violation.

(B)(i)

The complaint may specify a desired resolution to the complaint.

(ii)

If the complaint is timely filed but does not specify the desired resolution of the complainant:

(a)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall notify the complainant that a desired resolution is not specified; and

(b)

The complainant may file the additional information within ten (10) days from mailing of the notice.

(4)(A)

If a complaint does not meet the requirements of this section, the complaint shall be dismissed.

(B)

If a complaint is dismissed because it does not meet the requirements of this section, the State Board of Election Commissioners shall notify the complainant of the fact of dismissal.

(5)

A person shall not file a frivolous complaint.

(6)(A)

If a complaint is filed as required by this section, the State Board of Election Commissioners shall investigate the alleged violation.

(B)

Immediately upon beginning an investigation under this section, the State Board of Election Commissioners shall notify the person under investigation of the fact of the investigation and the nature of the investigation.

(C)

If at the conclusion of the investigation, the State Board of Election Commissioners finds that there is probable cause to believe there has been a violation of the voter registration laws or election laws, the State Board of Election Commissioners may set a public hearing.

(c)(1)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall maintain a record of all inquiries, investigations, and proceedings.

(2)

Except as provided in subdivisions (c)(3) and (4) of this section, records under this section are exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., until:

(A)

A hearing by the State Board of Election Commissioners is set; or

(B)

The investigation by the State Board of Election Commissioners is closed by the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(3)

The State Board of Election Commissioners may disclose, through its members or staff, otherwise confidential information to proper law enforcement officers, agencies, and other entities as is necessary to conduct the investigation under this section.

(4)

The records of the investigation upon which the State Board of Election Commissioners has based its findings shall be opened to public inspection thirty (30) days after the final adjudication in which the State Board of Election Commissioners makes a final decision.

(d)(1)

If the State Board of Election Commissioners determines that the complaint can be addressed through documentary submissions and without a formal investigation, the State Board of Election Commissioners may address the complaint with documentary submissions.

(2)

If the State Board of Election Commissioners determines that an investigation is necessary, the State Board of Election Commissioners shall provide to the person who is the subject of the complaint:

(A)

A copy of the complaint; and

(B)

Instructions for filing a response.

(3)

The State Board of Election Commissioners may:

(A)

Administer oaths for the purpose of taking sworn statements from witnesses in the course of its investigations;

(B)

Request the person who is the subject of the complaint to answer allegations in writing, produce relevant evidence, or appear in person before the State Board of Election Commissioners; and

(C)

Subpoena any person or the books, records, or other documents relevant to the investigation or inquiry.

(4)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall:

(A)

Provide the person subpoenaed with reasonable notice of the subpoena and an opportunity to respond; and

(B)

Advise the complainant and the person who is the subject of the complaint in writing of the final action of the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(e)

If the State Board of Election Commissioners finds a violation of the voter registration laws or election laws under its jurisdiction, the State Board of Election Commissioners may:

(1)

Issue a public letter of caution, warning, or reprimand;

(2)

Impose a fine of no less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a negligent, knowing, or intentional violation;

(3)

Report the information obtained in the investigation and the findings and determinations of the State Board of Election Commissioners to the appropriate law enforcement authorities;

(4)

Order payment of the costs of the investigation and hearing; or

(5)

Combine any of the sanctions authorized under this section.

(f)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall advise the complainant and the person who is the subject of the complaint of the:

(1)

Finding of the State Board of Election Commissioners;

(2)

Final action taken and sanctions issued by the State Board of Election Commissioners; and

(3)

Reasons for the findings, final actions, and sanctions.

(g)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall maintain a record of all inquiries, investigations, and proceedings.

(h)(1)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall adopt rules concerning the imposition of fines under this section.

(2)

If a person fails to pay the fines ordered by the State Board of Election Commissioners under this section, the State Board of Election Commissioners may obtain a judgment from a court for the amount of the fine imposed by filing suit in the:

(A)

Pulaski County Circuit Court;

(B)

Circuit court of the county in which the person resides; or

(C)

Small claims division of a district court.

(3)

The fee for filing of a suit in a circuit or district court in this state shall be waived for the State Board of Election Commissioners.

(4)

All moneys received by the State Board of Election Commissioners in payment of fines shall be deposited into the State Treasury as general revenues.

(i)(1)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall conclude its investigation and take its final action under this section within one hundred eighty (180) days of the filing of a complaint.

(2)

If the State Board of Election Commissioners holds a hearing under this section, the State Board of Election Commissioners shall conclude all actions under this section within two hundred forty (240) days.

(j)

A final action of the State Board of Election Commissioners under this section is an adjudication for purposes of judicial review under §25-15-212.

(k)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Election laws” means the Arkansas statutes concerning elections conducted by county boards of election commissioners and the rules promulgated by the State Board of Election Commissioners under §7-4-101 concerning elections conducted by county boards of election commissioners;

(2)

“Frivolous” means clearly lacking any basis in fact or law; and

(3)

“Voter registration laws” means those laws under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, and the rules promulgated pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1253, § 3; 2017, No. 247, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment deleted “of this subchapter” following “violation” in (e)(2).

7-4-121. Election audits.

(a)(1)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall audit the results of each general election to ensure the integrity and accuracy of the voting process.

(2)

When conducting a post-election audit of the election results, the State Board of Election Commissioners shall:

(A)

Select by lot the counties, polling sites, early voting locations, and vote centers to be audited;

(B)

Select a sufficient number of early voting locations, polling sites, and vote centers to obtain a meaningful sample;

(C)

Select the counties to be audited no less than sixty (60) days following the date of the general election;

(D)

Conduct the audit by using the voter-verified paper audit trail;

(E)(i)

Compile a report detailing the findings of this audit.

(ii)

The report filed under this subdivision (a)(2)(E):

(a)

Is not a recount;

(b)

Has no legal effect on the outcome of any election subject to the audit; and

(c)

Shall be made public and disseminated to any person upon request; and

(F)

Securely maintain any county election records obtained for the purpose of conducting an audit.

(3)

The Secretary of State may, at his or her discretion, provide additional staff to assist in conducting any audit under this subsection.

(b)(1)

The county clerk, county board of election commissioners, or other county election official for a county that is audited under this section shall provide documents, records, or access to election equipment requested by the State Board of Election Commissioners to the State Board of Election Commissioners upon request.

(2)

If the county clerk, county board of election commissioners, or other county election official of the county willfully fails to comply with a request made under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, and the State Board of Election Commissioners is not able to obtain the requested information through other means, the State Board of Election Commissioners may:

(A)

Find that the county in violation of subdivision (b)(1) of this section has forfeited reimbursement of state-funded election expenses for a period of up to two (2) years; and

(B)

Elect to withhold reimbursement of state-funded election expenses to the county for a period of up to two (2) years.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 888, § 2.

Subchapter 2

— Volunteer Deputy Voter Registrars

7-4-201 — 7-4-211. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning volunteer deputy voter registrars, was repealed by identical Acts 1995, Nos. 926 and 942, § 1. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

7-4-201. Acts 1987, No. 799, §§ 1, 2, 4.

7-4-202. Acts 1987, No. 799, § 3.

7-4-203. Acts 1987, No. 799, § 8.

7-4-204. Acts 1987, No. 799, §§ 4, 5.

7-4-205. Acts 1987, No. 799, § 4.

7-4-206. Acts 1987, No. 799, § 6.

7-4-207. Acts 1987, No. 799, §§ 9, 11; 1993, No. 1214, § 1.

7-4-208. Acts 1987, No. 799, §§ 7, 8.

7-4-209. Acts 1987, No. 799, §§ 10, 13.

7-4-210. Acts 1987, No. 799, § 12.

7-4-211. Acts 1989, No. 539, § 1.